Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2014.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Department of environmental quality; air emissions modeling; coordination; report; delayed repeal A. Within ninety days after the effective date of this act, the director of the department of environmental quality, in consultation with the associate director of the weights and measures services division of the Arizona department of agriculture, for each seasonal time period in area A as defined in section 49-541, Arizona Revised Statutes, and area C as defined in section 3-3401, Arizona Revised Statutes, shall evaluate, using the most recent air emissions model approved by the United States environmental protection agency, each of the following gasoline blends for compliance: 1. Federal phase II reformulated gasoline, as provided in 40 Code of Federal Regulations sections 1090.200 through 1090.295, in effect on January 1, 2021, as modified to meet, for each relevant time period, the maximum vapor pressure requirements in section 3-3433, subsections D and F, Arizona Revised Statutes, and the minimum oxygen content or percentage by volume of ethanol requirements prescribed in section 3-3492, Arizona Revised Statutes. 2. California phase 3 reformulated gasoline, as adopted by the California air resources board pursuant to California Code of Regulations title 13, sections 2261 through 2262.7 and 2265, in effect on February 16, 2014, as modified to meet, for each relevant time period, the minimum oxygen content or percentage by volume of ethanol requirements prescribed in section 3-3492, Arizona Revised Statutes. 3. Federal conventional gasoline, as modified to meet, for each relevant time period, the maximum vapor pressure requirements in section 3-3433, subsections D and F, Arizona Revised Statutes, and the minimum oxygen content or percentage by volume of ethanol requirements prescribed in section 3-3492, Arizona Revised Statutes. 4. Conventional gasoline or gasoline that otherwise meets the standards for ASTM D4814 and the maximum vapor pressure requirements in section 3-3433, subsection D, Arizona Revised Statutes. 5. On the effective date of this act, all gasoline or gasoline blends that are approved for sale or use in petroleum administration of defense district five and that have not been approved for sale or use in area A as defined in section 49-541, Arizona Revised Statutes, and area C as defined in section 3-3401, Arizona Revised Statutes, during any seasonal period and that have not been evaluated by the director of the department of environmental quality using the most recent air emissions model approved by the United States environmental protection agency. B. Within ninety days after completing the air emissions modeling required pursuant to subsection A of this section, the director of the department of environmental quality shall prepare and publish on the department's website a report containing the findings of the air emissions modeling completed pursuant to subsection A of this section and identifying each gasoline or gasoline blend that may be eligible for approval by the United States environmental protection agency to be sold or used in one or more regulated areas during one or more seasonal time periods. The director of the department of environmental quality shall submit a copy of the report to the associate director of the weights and measures services division of the Arizona department of agriculture, the governor, the president of the senate and speaker of the house of representatives and shall provide a copy of the report to the secretary of state. C. This section is repealed from and after September 30, 2027. Sec. 2. Weights and measures services division; feasibility study; coordination; report; delayed repeal A. Within ninety days after the associate director's receipt of the report required by section 1, subsection B of this act, the associate director of the weights and measures services division of the Arizona department of agriculture, in consultation with registered suppliers and oxygenate blenders, shall conduct a study to evaluate the feasibility of authorizing or obtaining for sale or use in this state each gasoline or gasoline blend identified in the report that meets the following criteria: 1. The gasoline or gasoline blend may be eligible for approval by the United States environmental protection agency to be sold or used in one or more regulated areas during one or more seasonal time periods. 2. The gasoline or gasoline blend is not currently authorized for sale or use in area A as defined in section 49-541, Arizona Revised Statutes, and area C as defined in section 3-3401, Arizona Revised Statutes, during any seasonal time period. B. Within ninety days after completing the feasibility study required by subsection A of this section, the associate director of the weights and measures services division of the Arizona department of agriculture shall prepare and publish on the division's website a report containing the following: 1. The findings of the feasibility study. 2. The impact of a potential gasoline's or gasoline blend's sale or authorization on this state's transportation fuel supply. 3. The availability of transportation or supply capacity to provide a potential gasoline or gasoline blend. C. The associate director of the weights and measures services division of the Arizona department of agriculture shall submit a copy of the report to the governor, the president of the senate and speaker of the house of representatives and shall provide a copy of the report to the secretary of state. D. Information the associate director of the weights and measures services division of the Arizona department of agriculture receives from a registered supplier or oxygenate blender pursuant to subsection A of this section shall be treated as sensitive information and kept confidential. In the report prepared pursuant to subsection B of this section, the associate director may not name, identify or provide any identifiable information of a registered supplier or oxygenate blender without the written consent of the registered supplier or oxygenate blender. E. This section is repealed from and after September 30, 2027. Sec. 3. Appropriation; department of environmental quality; air emissions modeling The sum of $100,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of environmental quality for air emission modeling. Sec. 4. Appropriation; Arizona department of agriculture; fuel blend feasibility study The sum of $100,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the Arizona department of agriculture for a fuel blend feasibility study.